Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 131. Town of Danville School District

§ 131-101.
Annual and special meetings.

All annual and special meetings of the Danville School District shall be called and warned in the manner provided by the laws of the State. All voting on the school budget at all annual and special meetings shall be by Australian ballot.